Maryland, session 2025, HB0520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–313.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0520*

HOUSE BILL 520
(2) “APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL” MEANS A SECRETARY OF A PRINCIPAL
DEPARTMENT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(3) “JOB SHARING ARRANGEMENT” MEANS AN EMPLOYMENT
ARRANGEMENT IN WHICH TWO PART–TIME EMPLOYEES SHARE AND PERFORM THE
DUTIES NORMALLY PERFORMED BY ONE FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE.
(4) “TRI–POSITION IDENTIFICATION NUMBER (TRI–PIN) SYSTEM”
MEANS A SYSTEM THAT DESIGNATES UP TO THREE POSITION IDENTIFICATION
NUMBERS (PIN) FOR EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION TRADITIONALLY FILLED BY ONE
EMPLOYEE IN WHICH THE POSITION MAY INSTEAD BE FILLED BY:
(I) A FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE WITH ONE PIN; OR
(II) TWO PART–TIME EMPLOYEES WHO ARE IN A JOB SHARING
ARRANGEMENT AND EACH HAVE THEIR OWN PIN.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL UNITS IN THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF
STATE GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING ALL UNITS WITH INDEPENDENT PERSONNEL
SYSTEMS.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THERE SHALL BE A
TRI–PIN SYSTEM APPLICABLE TO EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE.
(D) EACH APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL SHALL, FOR THE APPROPRIATE
OFFICIAL’S APPLICABLE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, REVIEW EACH
NEW OR EXISTING VACANCY IN A POSITION OCCURRING ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1,
2025, FOR POTENTIAL PLACEMENT IN A TRI–PIN SYSTEM FOR THE VACANT
POSITION;
(2) COMPLETE EACH REVIEW REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION WITHIN 15 MONTHS FOLLOWING A POSITION VACANCY; AND
(3) ON COMPLETION OF EACH REVIEW REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, AS APPROPRIATE:
(I) DESIGNATE THE VACANT POSITION AS ELIGIBLE FOR
PLACEMENT IN A TRI–PIN SYSTEM; OR

HOUSE BILL 520 3
(II) MAKE A RECORD EXPLAINING WHY THE VACANT POSITION
IS INELIGIBLE FOR PLACEMENT IN A TRI–PIN SYSTEM AND SHOULD BE FILLED BY
ONLY ONE FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE.
(E) WHEN CONDUCTING A REVIEW REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION, EACH APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE FEASIBILITY OF DIVIDING JOB DUTIES AMONG TWO
PART–TIME EMPLOYEES WITHOUT:
(I) COMPROMISING THE QUALITY OR TIMELINESS OF WORK; OR
(II) ALTERING THE BUDGETARY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
POSITION IF THE POSITION WERE TO BE FILLED BY ONE FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE;
(2) THE AVAILABILITY OF QUALIFIED PART–TIME CANDIDATES;
(3) POTENTIAL RECRUITMENT REQUIREMENTS;
(4) ANY IMPLICATIONS OF JOB SHARING ARRANGEMENTS ON
COMPLIANCE WITH LABOR LAWS, EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS, AND POTENTIAL
LIABILITY OR RISKS; AND
(5) ANY OTHER RELEVANT CRITERIA.
(F) EACH APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL SHALL ADVERTISE AND RECRUIT FOR A
VACANT POSITION BASED ON THE RESULTS OF THE REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.